Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.390

Professional evaluation.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) On receipt of a petition under RCW 11.130.360 and at the time the court appoints a court visitor under RCW 11.130.380, the court shall order a professional evaluation of the respondent.

(2) The respondent must be examined by a physician licensed to practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, or physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, selected by the court visitor who is qualified to evaluate the respondent's alleged cognitive and functional abilities and limitations and will not be advantaged or disadvantaged by a decision to grant the petition or otherwise have a conflict of interest. If the respondent opposes the professional selected by the court visitor, the court visitor shall obtain a professional evaluation from the professional selected by the respondent. The court visitor, after receiving a professional evaluation from the individual selected by the respondent, may obtain a supplemental evaluation from a different professional.

(3) The individual conducting the evaluation shall promptly provide the completed evaluation report to the court visitor who shall file the report in a sealed record with the court. Unless otherwise directed by the court, the report must contain:

(a) The professional's name, address, education, and experience;

(b) A description of the nature, type, and extent of the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities and limitations with regard to the management of the respondent's property and financial affairs;

(c) An evaluation of the respondent's mental and physical condition and, if appropriate, educational potential, adaptive behavior, and social skills;

(d) A prognosis for improvement with regard to the ability to manage the respondent's property and financial affairs;

(e) A description of the respondent's current medications, and the effect of the medications on the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities;

(f) Identification or persons with whom the professional has met or spoken with regarding the respondent; and

(g) The date of the examination on which the report is based.

(4) If the respondent declines to participate in an evaluation ordered under subsection (1) of this section, the court may proceed with the hearing under RCW 11.130.370 if the court finds that it has sufficient information to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the professional evaluation.

(5) A professional evaluation is not required if a petition for appointment of a conservator under RCW 11.130.360 is for a conservator for the property or financial affairs of a minor or for an adult missing, detained, or unable to return to the United States.

[2020 c 312 s 212; 2019 c 437 s 407.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.